Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 363A.08, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Requiring proof of driver's license prohibited. new text end new text begin (a) Except when based on a bona fide occupational qualification where driving is one of the essential job functions or is related to a legitimate business purpose for the position, it is an unfair employment practice for an employer, an employment agency, or a labor organization to: new text end new text begin (1) require, as a condition of employment or continuation of employment, an employee or applicant for employment to possess or present a valid driver's license; or new text end new text begin (2) refuse to accept from an employee or an applicant for employment, as an alternative to a driver's license, any other identification documents that are deemed acceptable for the purpose of forms prescribed by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services that are used for verifying the identity and employment authorization of individuals hired for employment in the United States. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in paragraph (a) shall be construed to prohibit an employer, an employment agency, or a labor organization from accepting a driver's license as identification if voluntarily offered by an employee or applicant for employment. new text end new text begin (c) The acceptance of a driver's license by an employer, an employment agency, or a labor organization if voluntarily offered by an employee or applicant for employment may not be used as evidence of a violation of this subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end